Utah statutes.
48-1d-114.   Withdrawal of filed record before effectiveness.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 48-1d-1024, 48-1d-1034, 48-1d-1044, and 48-1d-1054, a record delivered to the division for filing may be withdrawn before it takes effect by delivering to the division for filing a statement of withdrawal.

(2)  A statement of withdrawal must:

(a)  be signed by each person that signed the record being withdrawn, except as otherwise agreed by those persons;

(b)  identify the record to be withdrawn; and

(c)  if signed by fewer than all the persons that signed the record being withdrawn, state that the record is withdrawn in accordance with the agreement of all the persons that signed the record.

(3)  On filing by the division of a statement of withdrawal, the action or transaction evidenced by the original record does not take effect.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

